Washington statutes.
RCW 30A.12.180

Levy of assessments.

Whenever the director shall notify the board of directors of a bank to levy an assessment upon the stock of such corporation and the holders of two-thirds of the stock shall consent thereto, such board shall, within ten days from the issuance of such notice, adopt a resolution for the levy of such assessment, and shall immediately upon the adoption of such resolution serve notice upon each stockholder, personally or by mail, at his or her last known address, to pay such assessment; and that if the same be not paid within twenty days from the date of the issuance of such notice, his or her stock will be subject to sale and all amounts previously paid thereon shall be subject to forfeiture. If any stockholder fail within said twenty days to pay the assessment as provided in this section, it shall be the duty of the board of directors to cause a sufficient amount of the capital stock of such stockholder to be sold to make good the deficiency. The sale shall be held at such time and place as shall be designated by the board of directors and shall be either public or private, as the board shall deem best. At any time after the expiration of sixty days from the expiration of said twenty-day period the director may require any stock upon which the assessment remains unpaid to be canceled and deducted from the capital of the corporation. If such cancellation shall reduce the capital of the corporation below the minimum required by this title or its articles of incorporation the capital shall, within thirty days thereafter be increased to the required amount by original subscription, in default of which the director may take possession of such corporation in the manner provided by law in case of insolvency.

[ 2014 c 37 s 184; 1994 c 92 s 72; 1955 c 33 s 30.12.180. Prior: 1923 c 115 s 8; 1917 c 80 s 34; RRS s 3241. Formerly RCW 30.12.180.]